Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.07
Trails; applicability of other
law.

Acquisition
of private real property, or an interest therein, and any utilization of eminent
domain approved under sections 2-3234.02 to 2-3234.09 to establish a proposed
trail shall be conducted in the manner and subject to the requirements provided
in sections 25-2501 to 25-2506 and 76-701 to 76-726.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 6.